Illinois, session 104th, HB538.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency 5Borrowing Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 343/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Borrowing Act or the 9CURE Borrowing Act.10(Source: P.A. 101-630, eff. 5-29-20.)